Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-105
State Fair Foundation; authorized.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Nebraska State Fair Board establish the State Fair Foundation as a nonprofit foundation operated exclusively as a corporation for charitable purposes as contemplated by sections 170(c)(2) and 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, and organized and operated for the benefit of and to carry out the purposes of the board. The foundation may solicit, receive, hold, invest, and contribute funds and property for the use and benefit of the board in a manner consistent with the public good and primarily for capital expenditure and other needs not funded by other means.

Laws 2002, LB 1236, § 5.